District of Columbia statutes.
49-301

Commanding General.

(a)

There shall be appointed and commissioned by the President of the United States a Commanding General of the militia of the District of Columbia with the rank of brigadier general, or major general, who shall hold office until his successor is appointed and qualified, but may be removed at any time by the President.

(b)

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, any person serving as the Commanding General of the militia of the District of Columbia shall be considered to be an employee of the Department of Defense, and of the United States, within the meaning of § 2105 of Title 5, United States Code.

(c)

Any officer of the armed forces of the United States who, while serving on active duty, is detailed to serve as Commanding General of the militia of the District of Columbia shall, while so detailed, be entitled to receive only the pay and allowances to which he is entitled as an officer of the armed forces.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 773, ch. 328, § 7
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 596, Pub. L. 85-270, § 1
June 30, 1970, 84 Stat. 366, Pub. L. 91-297, title V, § 501(a)
1981 Ed., § 39-301.
1973 Ed., § 39-201.